Idaho, session 2026, H0633.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 36, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3622H, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3622H. FOOD FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION. There is hereby exempted from
the sales and use taxes imposed by this chapter the sale of food sold for hu-
man consumption. As used in this section, "food" shall have the same def-
inition as provided in 7 U.S.C. 2012 as that section existed on January 1,
2026. The types and kinds of food products eligible for exemption under this
section shall be the same types and kinds of food products that are eligi-
ble for purchase with benefits provided under the federal supplemental nu-
trition assistance program and do not include restaurant sales of food, food
sold in a heated state or heated by a seller, two (2) or more food ingredients
mixed or combined by a seller for a single sale, or food sold with an eating
utensil provided by the seller such as a plate, knife, fork, spoon, glass,
cup, napkin, or straw.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-3638, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3638. SALES TAX -- DISTRIBUTION. All moneys collected under this
chapter, except as may otherwise be required in sections 63-3203, 63-3620F,
and 63-3709, Idaho Code, shall be distributed by the state tax commission as
follows:
(1) An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account
sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized under this
chapter by the state tax commission shall be paid through the state refund
account, and those moneys are continuously appropriated.


(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) per year is continuously appro-
priated and shall be distributed to the permanent building fund, provided by
section 57-1108, Idaho Code.
(3) Four million eight hundred thousand dollars ($4,800,000) per year
is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed to the water pollution
control fund established by section 39-3628, Idaho Code.
(4) An amount equal to the sum required to be certified by the chair-
man of the Idaho housing and finance association to the state tax commis-
sion pursuant to section 67-6211, Idaho Code, in each year is continuously
appropriated and shall be paid to any capital reserve fund established by
the Idaho housing and finance association pursuant to section 67-6211, Idaho
Code. Such amounts, if any, as may be appropriated hereunder to the capital
reserve fund of the Idaho housing and finance association shall be repaid for
distribution under the provisions of this section, subject to the provisions
of section 67-6215, Idaho Code, by the Idaho housing and finance associa-
tion, as soon as possible, from any moneys available therefor and in excess
of the amounts the association determines will keep it self-supporting.
(5) An amount equal to the sum required by the provisions of sections
63-709 and 63-717, Idaho Code, after allowance for the amount appropriated
by section 63-718(3), Idaho Code, is continuously appropriated and shall be
paid as provided by sections 63-709 and 63-717, Idaho Code.
(6) An amount required by the provisions of chapter 53, title 33, Idaho
Code.
(7) An amount required by the provisions of chapter 87, title 67, Idaho
Code.
(8) For fiscal year 2011 and each fiscal year thereafter, four million
one hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000), of which two million two hundred
thousand dollars ($2,200,000) shall be distributed to each of the forty-four
(44) counties in equal amounts and one million nine hundred thousand dol-
lars ($1,900,000) shall be distributed to the forty-four (44) counties in
the proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of
the state. For fiscal year 2012 and for each fiscal year thereafter, the
amount distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be adjusted annually
by the state tax commission in accordance with the consumer price index for
all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. department of labor,
bureau of labor statistics, but in no fiscal year shall the total amount
allocated for counties under this subsection be less than four million one
hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000). Any increase resulting from the ad-
justment required in this section shall be distributed to each county in the
proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of the
state. Each county shall establish a special election fund to which shall
be deposited all revenues received from the distribution pursuant to this
subsection. All such revenues shall be used exclusively to defray the costs
associated with conducting elections as required of county clerks by the
provisions of section 34-1401, Idaho Code.
(9) One dollar ($1.00) on each application for certificate of title
or initial application for registration of a motor vehicle, snowmobile,
all-terrain vehicle or other vehicle processed by the county assessor or the
Idaho transportation department, excepting those applications in which any
sales or use taxes due have been previously collected by a retailer, shall be


a fee for the services of the assessor of the county or the Idaho transporta-
tion department in collecting such taxes and shall be paid into the current
expense fund of the county or state highway account established in section
40-702, Idaho Code.
(10) Eleven and five-tenths percent (11.5%) Thirteen and two-tenths
percent (13.2%) of revenues collected under this chapter, following any dis-
tributions required by sections 63-3203, 63-3620F, and 63-3709, Idaho Code,
and by subsection (1) of this section, is continuously appropriated and
shall be distributed to the revenue-sharing account, which is hereby created
in the state treasury, and the moneys in the revenue-sharing account will be
paid in installments each calendar quarter by the state tax commission as
follows:
(a) Forty-five and two-tenths percent (45.2%) shall be paid to the var-
ious cities as follows:
(i) The revenue-sharing amount calculated by the state tax com-
mission for the various cities for each quarter of fiscal year 2020
shall be the base amount for current quarterly revenue distribu-
tion amounts. The state tax commission shall calculate the per
capita distribution for each city resulting from the previous fis-
cal year's distributions.
(ii) If there is no change in the amount of the revenue-sharing
account from the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then the
various cities shall receive the same amount received for the same
quarter of the previous fiscal year.
(iii) If the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the cur-
rent quarter is greater than the balance of the revenue-sharing
account for the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then:
1. If the distributions made to the cities during the same
quarter of the previous fiscal year were below the base
amount established in fiscal year 2020, then the various
cities shall first receive a proportional increase up to the
base amount for each city and up to a one-percent (1%) in-
crease over such base amount. Any remaining moneys shall be
distributed to cities with a below-average per capita dis-
tribution in the proportion that the population of that city
bears to the population of all cities with below-average per
capita distributions within the state.
2. If the distributions made to the cities during the same
quarter of the previous fiscal year were at or above the
base amount established in fiscal year 2020, then the cities
shall receive the same distribution they received during the
same quarter of the previous fiscal year plus a proportional
increase up to one percent (1%). Any remaining moneys shall
be distributed to the cities with a below-average per capita
distribution in the proportion that the population of that
city bears to the population of all cities with a below-aver-
age per capita distribution within the state.
(iv) If the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the cur-
rent quarter is less than the balance of the revenue-sharing ac-
count for the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then the


cities shall first receive a proportional reduction down to the
base amount established in fiscal year 2020. If further reduc-
tions are necessary, the cities shall receive reductions based on
the proportion that each city's population bears to the population
of all cities within the state.
(b) Forty-seven and one-tenth percent (47.1%) shall be paid to the var-
ious counties as follows:
(i) Fifty-nine and eight-tenths percent (59.8%) of the amount to
be distributed under this paragraph (b) of this subsection shall
be distributed as follows:
1. One million three hundred twenty thousand dollars
($1,320,000) annually shall be distributed one forty-fourth
(1/44) to each of the various counties; and
2. The balance of such amount shall be paid to the various
counties, and each county shall be entitled to an amount in
the proportion that the population of that county bears to
the population of the state; and
(ii) Forty and two-tenths percent (40.2%) of the amount to be dis-
tributed under this paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be dis-
tributed as follows:
1. Each county that received a payment under the provisions
of section 63-3638(e), Idaho Code, as that subsection ex-
isted immediately prior to July 1, 2000, during the fourth
quarter of calendar year 1999, shall be entitled to a like
amount during succeeding calendar quarters.
2. If the dollar amount of money available under this sub-
section (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter does not equal the amount
paid in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each
county's payment shall be reduced proportionately.
3. If the dollar amount of money available under this sub-
section (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter exceeds the amount paid
in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each county
shall be entitled to a proportionately increased payment,
but such increase shall not exceed one hundred five percent
(105%) of the total payment made in the fourth quarter of
calendar year 1999.
4. If the dollar amount of money available under this sub-
section (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter exceeds one hundred five
percent (105%) of the total payment made in the fourth quar-
ter of calendar year 1999, any amount over and above such
one hundred five percent (105%) shall be paid to the various
counties in the proportion that the population of the county
bears to the population of the state; and
(c) Seven and seven-tenths percent (7.7%) of the amount appropriated in
this subsection shall be paid to the several counties for distribution
to special purpose taxing districts as follows:
(i) Each such district that received a payment under the provi-
sions of section 63-3638(e), Idaho Code, as such subsection ex-
isted immediately prior to July 1, 2000, during the fourth quarter


of calendar year 1999, shall be entitled to a like amount during
succeeding calendar quarters.
(ii) If the dollar amount of money available under this subsec-
tion (10)(c) in any quarter does not equal the amount paid in the
fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each special purpose taxing
district's payment shall be reduced proportionately.
(iii) If the dollar amount of money available under this subsec-
tion (10)(c) in any quarter exceeds the amount distributed under
paragraph (c)(i) of this subsection, each special purpose taxing
district shall be entitled to a share of the excess based on the
proportion each such district's current property tax budget bears
to the sum of the current property tax budgets of all such dis-
tricts in the state. Each year, starting with the distribution
for the quarter ending December 31, the state tax commission shall
calculate this distribution based on the district's current prop-
erty tax budgets, including any unrecovered forgone amounts as de-
termined under section 63-802(1)(e), Idaho Code. When a special
purpose taxing district is situated in more than one (1) county,
the state tax commission shall determine the portion attributable
to the special purpose taxing district from each county in which it
is situated.
(iv) If special purpose taxing districts are consolidated, the
resulting district is entitled to a base amount equal to the sum of
the base amounts received in the last calendar quarter by each dis-
trict prior to the consolidation.
(v) If a special purpose taxing district is dissolved or disin-
corporated, the state tax commission shall continuously distrib-
ute to the board of county commissioners an amount equal to the
last quarter's distribution prior to dissolution or disincorpora-
tion. The board of county commissioners shall determine any re-
distribution of moneys so received.
(vi) Taxing districts formed after January 1, 2001, are not en-
titled to a payment under the provisions of this paragraph (c) of
this subsection.
(vii) For purposes of this paragraph (c) of this subsection, a spe-
cial purpose taxing district is any taxing district that is not a
city, a county, or a school district.
(viii) Special purpose taxing districts shall use funds received
under the provisions of this subsection only for the purposes for
which the special purpose taxing districts were formed.
(11) Amounts calculated in accordance with section 2, chapter 356, laws
of 2001, for annual distribution to counties and other taxing districts be-
ginning in October 2001 for replacement of property tax on farm machinery and
equipment exempted pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code. For nonschool
districts, the state tax commission shall distribute one-fourth (1/4) of
this amount certified quarterly to each county. For school districts, the
state tax commission shall distribute one-fourth (1/4) of the amount cer-
tified quarterly to each school district. For nonschool districts, the
county auditor shall distribute such amounts to each district within thirty
(30) calendar days from receipt of moneys from the state tax commission.


Moneys received by each taxing district for replacement shall be utilized
in the same manner and in the same proportions as revenues from property
taxation. The moneys remitted to the county treasurer for replacement of
property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code, may
be considered by the counties and other taxing districts and budgeted at the
same time, in the same manner, and in the same year as revenues from taxation
on personal property, which these moneys replace. If taxing districts are
consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to an amount equal to the
sum of the amounts received in the last calendar quarter by each district
pursuant to this subsection prior to the consolidation. If a taxing district
is dissolved or disincorporated, the state tax commission shall continu-
ously distribute to the board of county commissioners an amount equal to the
last quarter's distribution prior to dissolution or disincorporation. The
board of county commissioners shall determine any redistribution of moneys
so received. If a taxing district annexes territory, the distribution of
moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall be unaffected. Taxing
districts formed after January 1, 2001, are not entitled to a payment under
the provisions of this subsection. School districts shall receive an amount
determined by multiplying the sum of the year 2000 school district levy mi-
nus .004 times the market value on December 31, 2000, in the district of the
property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code, pro-
vided that the result of these calculations shall not be less than zero (0).
The result of these school district calculations shall be further increased
by six percent (6%). For purposes of the limitation provided by section
63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this section as property tax
replacement for property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE,
Idaho Code, shall be treated as property tax revenues.
(12) Amounts necessary to pay refunds as provided in section 63-3641,
Idaho Code, to a developer of a retail complex shall be remitted to the demon-
stration pilot project fund created in section 63-3641, Idaho Code.
(13) Amounts calculated in accordance with section 63-602KK(4), Idaho
Code, for annual distribution to counties and other taxing districts for
replacement of property tax on personal property tax exemptions pursuant
to section 63-602KK(2), Idaho Code, which amounts are continuously ap-
propriated unless the legislature enacts a different appropriation for a
particular fiscal year. For purposes of the limitation provided by section
63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this section as property tax
replacement for property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602KK,
Idaho Code, shall be treated as property tax revenues. If taxing districts
are consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to an amount equal to
the sum of the amounts that were received in the last calendar year by each
district pursuant to this subsection prior to the consolidation. If a taxing
district or revenue allocation area annexes territory, the distribution of
moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall be unaffected. Taxing
districts and revenue allocation areas formed after January 1, 2022, are not
entitled to a payment under the provisions of this subsection.
(14) For fiscal year 2023 only, a sum of thirty-four million dollars
($34,000,000) shall be distributed each year by the state tax commission to
the forty-four (44) counties in the proportion that the expenditures of each
county for indigent defense services during county fiscal year 2021, exclud-


ing any state funding or grants, bear to the expenditures of all counties
in the state for indigent defense services during county fiscal year 2021,
excluding any state funding or grants. No later than July 1, 2022, the state
public defense commission shall certify to the state tax commission each
county's proportionate share of all counties' indigent defense expenses in
county fiscal year 2021, excluding any state funding or grants.
(15) For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, two and
twenty-five hundredths percent (2.25%) of revenues collected under this
chapter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3203,
63-3620F, and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1), (10), and (16)
of this section, is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed an-
nually to the homeowner property tax relief account established in section
63-724, Idaho Code.
(16)(a) Prior to July 1, 2025, four and five-tenths percent (4.5%) of
revenues collected under this chapter, following any distributions re-
quired by sections 63-3620F and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections
(1) and (10) of this section, but no less than eighty million dol-
lars ($80,000,000) and no more than one hundred forty million dollars
($140,000,000), shall be distributed as follows:
(i) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) is continuously appro-
priated and shall be distributed to the transportation expansion
and congestion mitigation fund established in section 40-720,
Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining moneys in excess of eighty million dollars
($80,000,000) provided for in this subsection is continuously ap-
propriated and shall be apportioned to local units of government
for local highway projects in the same percentages provided for in
section 40-709(1) through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of govern-
ment may pool funds allocated to them pursuant to this paragraph
for local highway projects.
(b) From July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, one hundred forty-five
million dollars ($145,000,000) of revenues collected under this chap-
ter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3620F and
63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1) and (10) of this section
shall be distributed as follows:
(i) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is continuously
appropriated and shall be distributed first to the transportation
expansion and congestion mitigation fund established in section
40-720, Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) pro-
vided for in this paragraph is continuously appropriated and shall
be apportioned to local units of government for local highway
projects in the same percentages provided for in section 40-709(1)
through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of government may pool funds
allocated to them pursuant to this subparagraph for local highway
projects.
(c) From July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, one hundred sixty-five
million dollars ($165,000,000) of revenues collected under this chap-
ter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3620F and


63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1) and (10) of this section
shall be distributed as follows:
(i) One hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) is contin-
uously appropriated and shall be distributed first to the trans-
portation expansion and congestion mitigation fund established in
section 40-720, Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) pro-
vided for in this paragraph is continuously appropriated and shall
be apportioned to local units of government for local highway
projects in the same percentages provided for in section 40-709(1)
through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of government may pool funds
allocated to them pursuant to this subparagraph for local highway
projects.
(d) Commencing July 1, 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter, one
hundred eighty-five million dollars ($185,000,000) of revenues col-
lected under this chapter, following any distributions required by
sections 63-3620F and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1) and
(10) of this section shall be distributed as follows:
(i) One hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) is contin-
uously appropriated and shall be distributed first to the trans-
portation expansion and congestion mitigation fund established in
section 40-720, Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) pro-
vided for in this paragraph is continuously appropriated and shall
be apportioned to local units of government for local highway
projects in the same percentages provided for in section 40-709(1)
through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of government may pool funds
allocated to them pursuant to this subparagraph for local highway
projects.
(17) Beginning in fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter,
three hundred thirty million dollars ($330,000,000) shall be distributed
annually to the general fund specifically for the public schools educa-
tional support program, and eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) shall be
distributed annually to the in-demand careers fund established in section
72-1206, Idaho Code. The state tax commission shall make such transfers in
quarterly installments.
(18) For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, three
and twenty-five hundredths percent (3.25%) of revenues collected under
this chapter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3203,
63-3620F, and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1), (10), and (16) of
this section, is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed annu-
ally to the school district facilities fund established pursuant to section
33-911, Idaho Code.
(19) One hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) collected
under this chapter, following any distributions required by sections
63-3620F and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1), (10), (15), (16),
and (18) of this section is continuously appropriated and shall be dis-
tributed to the school modernization facilities fund established in section
33-912, Idaho Code. The state tax commission shall make such transfers in
quarterly installments.


(20) Any moneys remaining over and above those necessary to meet and
reserve for payments under other subsections of this section shall be dis-
tributed to the general fund.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-3024A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-3077G, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 63-3077H, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 32-706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-706. CHILD SUPPORT. (1) In a proceeding for divorce or child sup-
port, the court may order either or both parents owing a duty of support to a
child to pay an amount reasonable or necessary for his or her support and edu-
cation until the child is eighteen (18) years of age, without regard to mari-
tal misconduct, after considering all relevant factors which may include:
(a) The financial resources of the child;
(b) The financial resources, needs, and obligations of both the custo-
dial and noncustodial parents which ordinarily shall not include a par-
ent's community property interest in the financial resources or obli-
gations of a spouse who is not a parent of the child, unless compelling
reasons exist;
(c) The standard of living the child enjoyed during the marriage;
(d) The physical and emotional condition and needs of the child and his
or her educational needs;
(e) The availability of medical coverage for the child at reasonable
cost as defined in section 32-1214B, Idaho Code; and
(f) The actual tax benefit recognized by the party claiming the federal
child dependency exemption.
(2) If the child continues his high school education subsequent to
reaching the age of eighteen (18) years, the court may, in its discretion,
and after considering all relevant factors which include those set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, order the continuation of support payments
until the child discontinues his high school education or reaches the age of
nineteen (19) years, whichever is sooner.
(3) All child support orders shall notify the obligor that the order
will be enforced by income withholding pursuant to chapter 12, title 32,
Idaho Code. Failure to include this provision does not affect the validity
of the support order. The court shall require that the social security num-
bers of both the obligor and obligee be included in the order or decree.
(4) In a proceeding for the support of a child or a minor parent, the
court may order the parent(s) of each minor parent to pay an amount reason-
able or necessary for the support and education of the child born to the minor
parent(s) until the minor parent is eighteen (18) years of age, after consid-
ering all relevant factors which may include:
(a) The financial resources of the child;


(b) The financial resources of the minor parent;
(c) The financial resources, needs and obligations of the parent of the
minor parent;
(d) The physical and emotional condition and needs of the child and his
or her educational needs; and
(e) The availability of medical coverage for the child at reasonable
cost as defined in section 32-1214B, Idaho Code.
(5) The legislature hereby authorizes and encourages the supreme court
of the state of Idaho to adopt and to periodically review for modification
guidelines that utilize and implement the factors set forth in subsections
(1) through (4) of this section to create a uniform procedure for reaching
fair and adequate child support awards. There shall be a rebuttable pre-
sumption that the amount of the award which would result from the applica-
tion of the guidelines is the amount of child support to be awarded, unless
evidence is presented in a particular case that indicates that an applica-
tion of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate. If the court de-
termines that circumstances exist to permit a departure from the guidelines,
the judge making the determination shall make a written or specific finding
on the record that the application of the guidelines would be unjust or in-
appropriate in the particular case before the court. When adopting guide-
lines, the supreme court shall provide that in a proceeding to modify an ex-
isting award, children of the party requesting the modification who are born
or adopted after the entry of the existing order shall not be considered.
(6) If the court awards one (1) parent the right to claim tax benefits
associated with his child or children, the court order need not list every
applicable tax benefit. The parent who was awarded the tax benefits for
the child or children shall attach a copy of the court order to his income
tax return. The state tax commission shall recognize the award of tax ben-
efits with respect to the child or children as applying to the child tax
credit under section 63-3029L, Idaho Code, the food tax credit under section
63-3024A, Idaho Code, and any and all other state and federal tax deductions,
exemptions, and credits for which the parent qualifies, unless the court
order specifies otherwise.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 1 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after June 1, 2026, and Sections 2 through 6 of this act shall be in full
force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.